Utah statutes.
63C-9-703.   Art Placement Subcommittee of the State Capitol Preservation Board -- Duties.

(1)  The subcommittee shall:

(a)  review and make recommendations to the board about the content and placement of each new piece of art to be placed within any public area on capitol hill;

(b)  review and make recommendations to the board about any proposals for removing or relocating any piece of art contained in any public area on capitol hill; and

(c)  review and make recommendations to the board about the content and placement of each new exhibit to be placed within any public area on capitol hill.

(2)  If any conflicts exist between this part and Section 36-5-1, Section 36-5-1 takes precedence.

(3)  If any conflict exists between this part and Section 67-1-16, Section 67-1-16 takes precedence.

